Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.400

Deposit with state treasurer.

Following its dissolution, the assets of a corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant, or shareholder of the corporation who cannot be found or who is not competent to receive them may be reduced to cash and deposited with the state treasurer for safekeeping. If assets are transferred to the state treasurer, and if the creditor, claimant, or shareholder furnishes satisfactory proof of entitlement to the amount deposited, the state treasurer or other appropriate state official shall pay such person or such person's representative that amount.

[ 2006 c 52 s 18; 1989 c 165 s 168.]